Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2207.31
Instructor, defined.

Instructor means a person approved by the board that meets or exceeds the instructor requirements specified in the Real Property Appraiser Act and rules and regulations of the board and is responsible for ensuring that the education activity content is communicated to the activity's audience as presented to the board for approval and that the education activity contributes to the quality of real property valuation services provided to the public. A person that communicates assigned materials or a portion of the education activity content under the authorization of the education provider, but is not responsible for the education activity content, is not an instructor.

Laws 2015, LB139, § 23;

R.S.Supp.,2016, § 76-2207.15;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 20.
April 12, 2018